Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202558-711
Information on status of Affordable Housing Trust Fund; report; contents.

(1) The Department of Economic Development shall submit, as part of the department's annual status report under section 81-1201.11, the following information regarding the Affordable Housing Trust Fund: (a) The applications funded during the previous calendar year; (b) the applications funded in previous years; (c) the identity of the organizations receiving funds; (d) the location of each project; (e) the amount of funding provided to each project; (f) the amount of funding leveraged as a result of each project; (g) the number of units of housing created by each project and the occupancy rate; (h) the expected cost of rent or monthly payment of those units; (i) the projected number of new employees and community investment as a result of each project; (j) the amount of revenue deposited into the Affordable Housing Trust Fund pursuant to section 76-903; (k) the total amount of funds for which applications were received during the previous calendar year, the year-end fund balance, and, if all available funds have not been committed, an explanation of the reasons why all such funds have not been so committed; (l) the amount of appropriated funds actually expended by the department for the previous calendar year; (m) the department's current budget for administration of the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act and the department's planned use and distribution of funds; and (n) project summaries, including the applicant, project description, and grant amount requested for every application seeking funds during the previous calendar year.

(2) The status report shall contain no information that is protected by state or federal confidentiality laws.

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB404, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB214, § 10;

Laws 2019, LB86, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB288, § 12.